zh-TW: 相容的鏈條寬度: 1/8 吋; 3/32 吋; 1/8 吋與 3/32 吋兩者; 其他
en: Compatible chain width: 1/8 in; 3/32 in; Both 1/8 in & 3/32 in; Other
pl: Kompatybilna szerokość łańcucha: 1/8 cala; 3/32 cala; Zarówno 1/8 cala, jak i 3/32 cala; Inne
sl-SI: Združljiva širina verige: 1/8 in; 3/32 in; Oboje 1/8 in in 3/32 in; Drugo
de: Kompatible Kettenbreite: 1/8 Zoll; 3/32 Zoll; 1/8 Zoll & 3/32 Zoll; Sonstige
hr-HR: Kompatibilna širina lanca: 1/8 in; 3/32 in; I 1/8 in i 3/32 in; Ostalo
pt-BR: Largura compatível da corrente: 1/8 pol; 3/32 pol; Ambos 1/8 pol e 3/32 pol; Outro
th: ความกว้างของโซ่ที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: 1/8 นิ้ว; 3/32 นิ้ว; ทั้ง 1/8 นิ้วและ 3/32 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
vi: Chiều rộng xích tương thích: 1/8 inch; 3/32 inch; Cả 1/8 inch & 3/32 inch; Khác
pt-PT: Largura da corrente compatível: 1/8 pol.; 3/32 pol.; Ambas, 1/8 pol. e 3/32 pol.; Outro
cs: Kompatibilní šířka řetězu: 1/8 in; 3/32 in; 1/8 in i 3/32 in; Jiné
sk-SK: Kompatibilná šírka reťaze: 1/8 palca; 3/32 palca; 1/8 palca aj 3/32 palca; Iné
hu: Kompatibilis láncszélesség: 1/8 in; 3/32 in; Mindkettő (1/8 in és 3/32 in); Egyéb
nl: Compatibele kettingbreedte: 1/8 inch; 3/32 inch; Beide 1/8 inch en 3/32 inch; Overig
fi: Yhteensopiva ketjun leveys: 1/8 in; 3/32 in; Sekä 1/8 in että 3/32 in; Muu
da: Kompatibel kædebredde: 1/8 tomme; 3/32 tomme; Både 1/8 tomme og 3/32 tomme; Andet
zh-CN: 适配链条宽度: 1/8 英寸; 3/32 英寸; 1/8 英寸和 3/32 英寸; 其他
nb: Kompatibel kjedebredde: 1/8 tomme; 3/32 tomme; Både 1/8 tomme og 3/32 tomme; Annet
ru: Совместимая ширина цепи: 1/8 дюйма; 3/32 дюйма; 1/8 и 3/32 дюйма; Другое
lt-LT: Suderinamas grandinės plotis: 1/8 col.; 3/32 col.; Ir 1/8 col., ir 3/32 col.; Kita
fr: Largeur de chaîne compatible: 1/8 po; 3/32 po; 1/8 po et 3/32 po; Autre
el: Συμβατό πλάτος αλυσίδας: 1/8 in; 3/32 in; Και 1/8 in και 3/32 in; Άλλο
tr: Uyumlu zincir genişliği: 1/8 inç; 3/32 inç; Hem 1/8 inç hem 3/32 inç; Diğer
es: Ancho de cadena compatible: 1/8 pulg.; 3/32 pulg.; Ambos 1/8 pulg. y 3/32 pulg.; Otro
sv: Kompatibel kedjebredd: 1/8 tum; 3/32 tum; Både 1/8 tum och 3/32 tum; Annat
ko: 호환 체인 폭: 1/8인치; 3/32인치; 1/8인치 및 3/32인치 모두; 기타
ja: 互換性のあるチェーン幅: 1/8インチ; 3/32インチ; 1/8インチと3/32インチの両方; その他
it: Larghezza della catena compatibile: 1/8 in; 3/32 in; Entrambi 1/8 in e 3/32 in; Altro
bg-BG: Съвместима ширина на верига: 1/8 инча; 3/32 инча; И 1/8 инча, и 3/32 инча; Друго
ro-RO: Lățime compatibilă a lanțului: 1/8 in; 3/32 in; Ambele: 1/8 in și 3/32 in; Altele